District of Columbia statutes.
44-661.08

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5069, 62 DCR 10905